District of Columbia statutes.
8-2005

Care and use of horses in horse-drawn carriage trade.

(a)

An owner, operator, or custodian of a horse engaged in the horse-drawn carriage trade shall:

(1)

Not use, work, drive, ride, or require labor from a horse for more than 8 hours in any 24-hour period;

(2)

Provide for adequate rest periods for a horse during the 8 hours of use;

(3)

Provide the horse with food and drinking water from a clean container of sufficient size and in good condition during the regular intervals during the 8 hours of use;

(4)

Drape the body of the horse from forelegs to hind legs with a warm covering during times of cold or inclement weather;

(5)

Park the horse in an area of shade whenever practicable during rest periods;

(6)

Not overdrive or overload a horse as evidenced by physical stress, strain, or exhaustion of the horse; and

(7)

Not beat or prod a horse to maintain a fast gait in any way that will cause pain or injury to the horse.

(b)

An owner, operator, or custodian of a horse engaged in the horse-drawn carriage trade shall not use a horse to draw a carriage unless:

(1)

The horse is in good health in accordance with standards established by the Mayor by rule;

(2)

The horse weighs at least 1,100 pounds; and

(3)

The hooves of the horse are properly shod and trimmed utilizing rubber compound shoes on the front 2 hooves and either rubber or open steel borium cork tip shoes on the 2 rear hooves.

History

Mar. 7, 1991, D.C. Law 8-224, § 6, 38 DCR 207
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 16(b), 40 DCR 6311

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-2003.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1035.